District of Columbia statutes.
5-119.03

Registration record.

All such property and money shall be particularly registered by the Property Clerk in a book kept for that purpose, which shall contain also a record of the names of the persons from whom such property or money was taken, the names of all claimants thereto, the place where found, the time of the seizure, the date of the receipt, the general circumstances connected therewith, and any final disposal of such property and money.

R.S., D.C., § 410

History

1981 Ed., § 4-154.
1973 Ed., § 4-153.

Prior Codifications